Hawaii, session 2026, SB521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 174C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§174C-    Access to water on Hawaiian home lands; county board or department of water supply; agreements.  The department of Hawaiian home lands shall work with the appropriate county board or department of water supply to provide access to potable and agricultural water on Hawaiian home lands; provided that any agreement between the department of Hawaiian home lands and the county board or department of water supply shall be made available to the public." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________